District of Columbia statutes.
29-1202.04

Signing and filing pursuant to judicial order.

(a)

If a person required by this title to sign a record or deliver a record to the Mayor for filing under this title does not do so, any other person that is aggrieved may petition the Superior Court to order:

(1)

The person to sign the record;

(2)

The person to deliver the record to the Mayor for filing; or

(3)

The Mayor to file the record unsigned.

(b)

If the petitioner under subsection (a) of this section is not the statutory trust to which the record pertains, the petitioner shall make the trust a party to the action.

(c)

A record filed pursuant to subsection (a)(3) of this section is effective without being signed.

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(l)(3)(C), 59 DCR 13171
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.
This section is referenced in § 29-1202.05.